California statutes. Education Code
 to be for the benefit to a school district, as defined in Section 41302.5, or a community college district. This paragraph shall not be construed to exclude any funding appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, for part-day California state preschool programs under Article 7 (commencing with Section 8235) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, to create a full day of care for children participating in the California state preschool program, or for the After School Education and Safety Program established pursuant to Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) Any appropriation made to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund or to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund except those appropriations for reimbursable state mandates imposed on or before January 1, 1988.

(3) Any appropriation made to service any public debt approved by the voters of this state.

(4) With the exception of the programs identified in paragraph (1), commencing with the 2011–12 fiscal year, any funds appropriated for the Child Care and Development Services Act, pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(5) Any amount recognized for budgetary and financial reporting purposes pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of, and paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of, Section 41206.04.

(g) “Allocated local proceeds of taxes,” as used in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means, for school districts as defined, those local
 revenues, except revenues identified pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (j) of Section 42238.02, that are used to offset state aid for school districts in calculations performed pursuant to Sections 2558 and 42238 and Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30.

(h) “Allocated local proceeds of taxes,” as used in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, means, for community college districts, those local revenues that are used to offset state aid for community college districts. In no event shall the revenues or receipts derived from student fees be considered “allocated local proceeds of taxes.”

(i) For purposes of calculating the 4-percent entitlement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “the total amount required pursuant to Section 8(b)” shall mean
 the General Fund aid required for schools pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, and shall not include allocated local proceeds of taxes.

(j) This section shall become inoperative on December 15, 2012, and, as of January 1, 2013, is repealed, only if the Schools and Local Public Safety Protection Act of 2012 (Attorney General reference number 12-0009) is not approved by the voters at the November 6, 2012, statewide general election, or if the provisions of that act that modify personal income tax rates do not become operative due to a conflict with another initiative measure that is approved at the same election and receives a greater number of affirmative votes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 13.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Note: Conditions, in subd. (j), for inoperation and repeal failed; Prop. 30 was approved on Nov. 6, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41202.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) The Legislature acted to implement Proposition 98 soon after its passage by defining “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes” to include the entirety of programs funded under the Child Care and Development Services Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(2) In California Teachers Assn. v. Hayes (1992) 5 Cal.App.4th 1513, the Court of Appeal permitted the inclusion of childcare within the Proposition 98 minimum funding guarantee but left open the possibility of excluding particular childcare programs that did not directly
 advance and support the educational mission of school districts.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify that the part-time state preschool programs administered by local educational agencies and the After School Education and Safety Program fall within the Proposition 98 minimum guarantee and to fund other childcare programs less directly associated with school districts from appropriations that do not count toward the Proposition 98 minimum guarantee.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of making the computations required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in the 2011–12 fiscal year and each subsequent fiscal year, both of the following apply:

(1) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California
 Constitution, “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87” does not include General Fund revenues appropriated for any program within Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, with the exception of (A) funds appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, for the part-day California state preschool programs set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 8235), (B) funds appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, to create a full day of care for children participating in the California state preschool program, and (C) the After School Education and Safety Program in Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482). The Director of Finance shall adjust accordingly “the percentage of General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87,” for purposes of applying that
 percentage in the 2011–12 fiscal year and each subsequent fiscal year in making the calculations required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) General Fund revenues appropriated in the 2010–11 fiscal year or any subsequent fiscal year for any program within Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, with the exception of (A) funds appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, for the part-day California state preschool programs set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 8235), (B) funds appropriated to local educational agencies, as defined in Section 8208, to create a full day of care for children participating in the California state preschool program, and (C) the After School Education and Safety Program in Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482), are not included within the “total allocations to school
 districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” for purposes of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 21.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.

Any calculation of the moneys to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, shall be made as a single, aggregate calculation for the school districts serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, for the community college districts, and for the direct elementary and secondary level instructional services provided by the State of California.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 62.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.1.

(a) For the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, allocations calculated pursuant to Section 41203 shall be distributed in accordance with calculations provided in this section. Notwithstanding Section 41203, and for purposes of this section, school districts, community college districts, and direct elementary and secondary level instructional services provided by the State of California shall be regarded as separate segments of public education, and each of these three segments of public education shall be entitled to receive respective shares of the amount calculated pursuant to Section 41203 as though the calculation made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution were to be applied separately to each segment and the base year for purposes of this calculation
 under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution were based on the 1989–90 fiscal year. Calculations made pursuant to this subdivision shall be made so that each segment of public education is entitled to the greater of the amounts calculated for that segment pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) If the single calculation made pursuant to Section 41203 yields a guaranteed amount of funding that is less than the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to subdivision (a), the amount calculated pursuant to Section 41203 shall be prorated for the three segments of public education.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this section does not apply to the 1992–93 to the
 2026–27
 fiscal years, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 46.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Section inapplicable until July 1, 2027, pursuant to subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

41203.3.

On or after the effective date of the act adding this section to the Education Code, in order for an appropriation that is not made for allocation to and administration by school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5 of the Education Code, or to community college districts to be counted towards the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation shall, in addition to all other requirements of law, have statutory authorization independent of the annual Budget Act that reflects a legislative determination that the appropriation shall be counted toward satisfying that obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 78, Sec. 3.   Effective June 28, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.5.

(a) In any fiscal year in which the amount of the moneys that are required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts is determined under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, a supplemental appropriation shall be made from the General Fund for the support of those entities in that sum by which the amount determined under that paragraph is exceeded by the amount computed under subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) The amount of General Fund revenues required to assure that the rate of growth in total allocations per unit of average daily attendance to school districts and community college districts from General Fund
 proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, excluding any revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, and allocated local proceeds of taxes is not less than the rate of growth in per capita appropriations for all other programs and services from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, excluding any revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(c) In no event shall the total amount appropriated in any fiscal year pursuant to this section and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution exceed the amount that would have been computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the
 California Constitution.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, this section does not apply to the 2016–17 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 24.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.6.

For purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b)” shall not be deemed to mean either the amount applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts in a fiscal year for which subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is suspended pursuant to subdivision (h) of that section, or the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 60, Sec. 2.   Applicable from July 1, 1990, pursuant to Secs. 8 and 9 of Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a supplemental appropriation shall be made from the General Fund for the support of school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, in each fiscal year for the purposes set forth in subdivision (c). The amount of that supplemental appropriation shall be equal to the sum of the amount allocated to school districts pursuant to this section in the prior fiscal year and 25 percent of the amount, if any, allocated to school districts in the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. That amount shall be adjusted annually for changes in enrollment, and for the change in the cost of living pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(b) The funds appropriated for the purposes of subdivision (a) shall be allocated to each school district in an equal amount per unit of enrollment, in accordance with the allocation procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(c) The amount allocated to each school district pursuant to this section shall be used only for the reduction of class size in any grade level or subject area. That class size reduction shall occur in any manner determined by the governing board of the school district. Not later than 90 days following each fiscal year in which a school district receives funding pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall certify in writing to the Superintendent that all expenditures of that funding were in compliance with this
 subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 32.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41203.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a supplemental appropriation shall be made from the General Fund in the annual Budget Act for the support of community college districts in each fiscal year for the purposes specified in the Budget Act. The amount of that supplemental appropriation shall be equal to the sum of the amount allocated to community college districts pursuant to this section in the prior fiscal year and 25 percent of the amount, if any, allocated to community college districts in the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. That amount shall be adjusted annually for changes in enrollment, and for the change in the cost of living pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(b) The funds appropriated for the purposes of subdivision (a) shall be allocated to each community college district in an equal amount per unit of enrollment, in accordance with the allocation procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 61, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, pursuant to “The Classroom Instructional Improvement and Accountability Act,” that school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, and community college districts, as constituted during the 1986–87 fiscal year, annually receive a basic minimum portion of the revenues that is equivalent to the percentage of revenues that were deposited to the General Fund in that year.

(b) In recognition of this intent, it is further the intent of the Legislature that both houses and the Governor be guided by the following:

(1) If the revenues of a tax that were deposited in the General Fund in
 the 1986–87 fiscal year are redirected to another fund, or level of government, then the percentages of General Fund revenues required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services shall be recalculated as if those revenues were not deposited in the General Fund in the 1986–87 fiscal year.

(2) If the allocated local proceeds of taxes, as defined by subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 41202, received by a school district or community college district during the 1986–87 fiscal year are redirected to other entities or statutorily or constitutionally reduced or eliminated, the additional General Fund support provided to replace the allocated local proceeds of taxes may not be counted as General Fund revenues required to be applied for the support of school districts, community college districts, and state agencies
 providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, unless the percentage of General Fund revenues appropriated to school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services in the 1986–87 fiscal year is adjusted to reflect the amount of General Fund support that would have been provided in the 1986–87 fiscal year had the allocated local proceeds of taxes been correspondingly reduced.

(3) If a program of a school district, as defined in Section 41302.5, or of a community college district was supported by state funds from a source other than the General Fund during the 1986–87 fiscal year and General Fund moneys are subsequently provided in support of the program and in lieu of the other source of funds, the supplanting General Fund revenues shall
 not be counted as moneys to be applied by the state for the support of school districts or community college districts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(c) Programs that existed in the 1986–87 fiscal year, and were not the functional responsibility of school districts or community college districts in that fiscal year, shall not be shifted to the responsibility or financial support of school districts or community college districts without appropriate corresponding adjustment to the calculations made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent the creation of a new educational program that is supported by a General Fund appropriation made in conformity with subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(d) Enrollment, average daily attendance, or average daily attendance equivalents used for the purpose of calculating “increases in enrollment” pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution shall not be redefined, adjusted, or otherwise recalculated unless the appropriate action is taken to neutralize the effect of the change with respect to the adjustment required to be made for increases in enrollment.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 63.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.1.

(a) (1) Pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 41204, the Director of Finance shall annually adjust “the percentage of General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87” for purposes of applying paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, to reflect those property tax revenue allocation modifications required by the qualifying provisions in a manner that ensures that those modifications will have no net fiscal impact upon the amounts that are otherwise required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) For purposes of this section, “qualifying provisions,” means all of the following:

(A) The amendments made to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Article 7 (commencing with Section 33680) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code during the 1991–92 Regular Session to the 2003–04 Regular Session, inclusive, and during any Extraordinary Session concurrently held during those session years, inclusive.

(B) Section 97.80 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(C) Section 100.06 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2004–05 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, “the percentage of General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community colleges districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87,” for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, shall be deemed to be the percentage of General Fund revenues that would have been appropriated for those entities if the qualifying provisions had been operative for the 1986–87 fiscal year.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the act adding this section to ensure both of the following:

(1) That the changes required by the qualifying provisions in the allocations of ad valorem property tax revenues do not have a net fiscal impact upon school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, or community college districts.

(2) That the changes required by the qualifying provisions in the allocations of ad valorem property tax revenues do not have a net fiscal impact upon the amounts of revenue otherwise required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares this section to be in furtherance of the purposes set forth in Section 41204.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1992–93 fiscal year, the percentage of “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87,” for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, shall be deemed to be the percentage of General Fund revenues that would have been appropriated for those entities if the amendments made to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by statutes enacted during the 1991–92 Regular Session having the effect that property tax revenues are shifted from one or more counties, cities, or special districts to one or more school districts or community college districts, had been operative for the 1986–87 fiscal year.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1993–94 fiscal year and each year thereafter, the percentage of “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87,” for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, shall be deemed to be the percentage of General Fund revenues that would have been appropriated for those entities if the amendments made to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by statutes enacted during the 1991–92 Regular Session and the amendments made to that chapter by statutes enacted during the 1993–94 Regular Session having the effect that property tax revenues are shifted from one or more counties, cities, or special districts to one or more school districts or community college districts, had been operative for the 1986–87 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 9.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.6.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the purposes of determining the minimum state school funding obligation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 1993–94 fiscal year and the supplemental appropriation for school districts and community college districts pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41203.5 of the Education Code for the 1993–94 fiscal year, the 1993–94 fiscal year “appropriations for all other programs and services from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, excluding any revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 41203.5, shall be deemed to be appropriations for all other programs and services from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, excluding any revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, that would have been appropriated for those entities if the amendments made to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by statutes enacted during the 1993–94 Regular Session having the effect that property tax revenues are shifted from one or more counties, cities, or special districts to one or more school districts, county offices of education, or community college districts, had not been enacted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 10.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41204.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Director of Finance shall annually adjust the percentage of General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts and community college districts, respectively, in fiscal year 1986–87 for purposes of making the calculations required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, so that any annual increase in local control funding formula apportionments generated by an increase in average daily attendance due to the implementation of Section 48000 results in a commensurate increase in General Fund proceeds of taxes and allocated local proceeds of taxes that are required to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant
 to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) The amount of the adjustment described in subdivision (a) for a given fiscal year shall be considered final as of the final prior year certification pursuant to Section 41206.01.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 17.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41205.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the only state agencies that provide direct elementary and secondary level instructional services within the meaning of Section 41302.5 are those state agencies enumerated in Section 8880.5 of the Government Code, or in any successor to that section, not including any agency enumerated in any of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of that section, and California Indian education centers as established pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 33380) of Chapter 3 of Part 20. The amount of any appropriation made to a state agency for direct elementary and secondary level instruction services shall be determined by applying the definition of those services, as defined in the California School Accounting Manual, to the expenditures of the agency. However, for the Diagnostic Schools for Neurologically Handicapped Children, as established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 59200) of Chapter 3 of Part 32, all expenditures of the agency shall be considered appropriations made to a state agency for direct elementary and secondary level instruction.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 153) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Proposition 98 was enacted by the voters in 1988 to provide a minimum funding level for schools. The Legislature can exceed the minimum funding level required by Proposition 98 but it cannot provide less funding than the California Constitution requires, unless the Legislature suspends the minimum funding level pursuant to a separately enacted statute, adopted with a two-thirds vote of the Legislature.

(b) The local control funding formula is the primary means of allocating Proposition 98 funds and was enacted to increase local control, to simplify the allocation of school funding to school districts, and to increase school funding across the state, providing the
 largest increases to school districts serving our neediest pupils.

(c) Now that the transition to the local control funding formula is complete, it is time to enhance the certainty of Proposition 98 by ensuring local control funding formula funds flow to school districts without delay.

(d) Chapter 39 of the Statutes of 2018 furthers the purposes of Proposition 98 through enactment of a continuous appropriation for local control funding formula funding that is automatically adjusted for increases in the cost of living and changes in enrollment to provide the funding guaranteed to school districts under the California Constitution.

(e) With enactment of a continuous appropriation comes a heightened need to know with certainty the amount of funding that is required to be provided to school districts under the California
 Constitution.

(f) While prior law created a mechanism to certify the Proposition 98 minimum guarantee to provide certainty and to allocate owed funds to schools in a timely manner, the mechanism was unenforceable and rarely implemented.

(g) The Proposition 98 minimum guarantee was last certified in the 2008–09 fiscal year by statute. Outstanding issues, including when a maintenance factor is created, how the maintenance factor is repaid, the impact on the constitutional minimum guarantee of funding and revenue changes, as well as which programs can be funded with Proposition 98 funds, have delayed certification of the Proposition 98 minimum funding guarantee. These delays in certification create uncertainty, lead to questions regarding the level of funding required for certain years, and can lead to delays in payment of settle-up funds. Notwithstanding the significance of
 outstanding issues, school districts and the state need to know with certainty the total amount of funding to which they are entitled and the state’s plan for providing all of that funding.

(h) Section 41207.31 certifies the Proposition 98 minimum guarantee for the 2009–10 to 2015–16, inclusive, fiscal years based on final school enrollment, personal income, and revenue data. Section 41206.01 replaces the existing certification process with a new transparent, mandatory process to certify the Proposition 98 minimum guarantee and provide settle-up funds on a timely basis commencing with the 2016–17 fiscal year minimum guarantee.

(i) Section 41206.01 is in addition to existing law that provides for calculation and recalculation of the minimum funding obligation to school districts under Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, as well as provisions in current law that
 account for necessary revenues being set aside for these obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 47.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.01.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, all determinations of percentages, amounts, revenues, appropriations, allocations, proceeds of taxes, increases in cost of living, or enrollments shall be based upon the best available estimate until actual data becomes available, and then upon actual data when it is available.

(b) Each year, by no later than April 25, the Superintendent shall provide the Director of Finance the latest available school enrollment data, allocated local proceeds of taxes received by school districts, apportionment data calculated and the related funding allocated pursuant to Section 14002, and all other final allocations of funds provided to school districts for the prior fiscal
 year.

(c) Each year, by no later than April 25, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the Director of Finance final community college enrollment data, allocated local proceeds of taxes received by community college districts, and final allocations of all funds provided to community college districts for the prior fiscal year.

(d) (1) Every year, by no later than May 14 following the end of the prior fiscal year, based on the data provided by the Superintendent and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), and on the Department of Finance’s final projection of General Fund revenues for the prior fiscal year, the Director of Finance shall recalculate the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the
 California Constitution for the prior fiscal year. As part of the May Revision to the Governor’s Budget required by subdivision (e) of Section 13308 of the Government Code, the Director of Finance shall publish the Department of Finance’s calculation and the underlying data supporting the calculation, including the percentage for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, whether paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is applicable, any amount that shall not be considered allocations to school districts and community colleges for purposes of computing the amount of state aid in the subsequent fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the creation or restoration of the maintenance factor, school district and community college enrollment, General Fund revenues, changes in per capita personal income, changes in per capita
 General Fund revenues, and property taxes to be provided in satisfaction of the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the prior fiscal year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Director of Finance shall publish the required calculations and the underlying data supporting the calculations for the 2022–23 fiscal year no later than June 30, 2024.

(e) (1) The Superintendent, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and interested parties shall submit any comments on the Department of Finance’s proposed calculations and published data to the Director of Finance and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by no later than June 6 of each year.

(2) Notwithstanding
 paragraph (1), comments on the Department of Finance’s proposed calculations and published data for the 2022–23 fiscal year shall be submitted no later than July 8, 2024.

(f) (1) The Director of Finance shall review any comments directed at the proposed Proposition 98 certification. Comments not directed at the proposed Proposition 98 certification shall be considered irrelevant and shall not be responded to by the Director of Finance. The Director of Finance shall accept or reject any timely relevant comments. If the Director of Finance accepts a comment, the Director of Finance shall include a written explanation of how the proposed Proposition 98 certification addresses or accommodates the comment. If the Director of Finance rejects a comment, the Director of Finance shall include a written explanation of the reason for the rejection of the comment. These comments and the Director of Finance’s response to the comments
 shall be provided to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and published on the Department of Finance’s internet website by no later than June 30 of each year. The Legislature shall consider the comments and responses, may hold public hearings as necessary, and shall provide any additional written comments to the Director of Finance no later than July 31 of each year. The Director of Finance shall take into consideration any comments provided by the Legislature and issue a final certification of the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts required by subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the fiscal year being certified by no later than August 15 of each year. This information shall be published on the Department of Finance’s internet website by the same date. The final certification, including the underlying data and calculations, shall also be published in a separate schedule of the
 Governor’s Budget submitted to the Legislature by no later than January 10 of the following year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Director of Finance shall post the comments and the Director of Finance’s response to the comments regarding the Proposition 98 certification for the 2022–23 fiscal year on the Department of Finance’s internet website by no later than July 30, 2024, and shall publish the final certification, including the underlying data and calculations, by no later than August 15, 2024.

(g) Any judicial action to challenge, review, set aside, void, or annul the Director of Finance’s final certification of the state’s minimum funding obligation pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be filed no later than the 90th day following issuance of the certification. That action shall be given precedence on the court’s docket. The filing of that action shall not stay the
 appropriation or allocation of any sums deemed by the Director of Finance to be due pursuant to Section 41206.03.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 15.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

41206.02.
